Utah statutes.
7-18a-102.   Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1)  "Agency" means a place of business of a foreign depository institution
located in this state that is authorized to exercise the powers permitted in
Section 7-18a-301.
(2)  "Branch," when used in reference to a foreign depository institution,
means a place of business of a foreign depository institution located in this
state that is authorized to exercise the powers permitted in Section
7-18a-301.
(3)  "Foreign person" means a person who is a citizen or national of a
country, including any colony, dependency, or possession of such country,
other than the United States.
(4)  "Representative office" means a place of business of a foreign depository
institution located in this state that is authorized to exercise powers
permitted in Section 7-18a-301.
